Colorado, session 2026A, HB1278.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Projects built by public utilities fulfill an essential public need,
supporting the health, safety, economic prosperity, and welfare of
Coloradans by ensuring access to electricity, gas, water, and
telecommunications services;
(b) Individual property rights are fundamental to our constitutional
order, protected by the fifth amendment of the United States constitution
and section 15 of article II of the state constitution, which states that
"[p]rivate property shall not be taken or damaged, for public or private
use, without just compensation";
(c) These constitutional provisions prohibit the taking of private
property for speculative or undefined public uses, ensuring that
condemnations are necessary, justified, and executed with due process;
(d) Under Colorado law, investor-owned electric utilities that hold
a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the public
utilities commission may initiate condemnation proceedings prior to
obtaining all required local government land use permits and approvals,
which creates circumstances in which private property is condemned
without certainty that the property is necessary for a final, approved
-2- HB26-1278

project;
(e) Speculative acquisitions of property via condemnation
undermine constitutional protections, burden landowners, and erode
public trust in both government and utility providers;
(f) Local governments exercise their land use powers to regulate
development in harmony with local needs, environmental stewardship,
and community priorities. Preserving these powers ensures that
investor-owned electric utility projects are implemented with full
consideration of local impacts while serving statewide and regional public
needs.
(g) Therefore, it is the intent of the general assembly to protect
private property rights, uphold constitutional takings standards, and
reinforce local government land use authority by clarifying that no
condemnation action taken by an investor-owned electric utility may
occur until final approval of the project, including local government
authorization, has been granted.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 40-5-101.3 as
follows:
40-5-101.3. Construction of electric transmission
infrastructure - certificate of public convenience and necessity -
eminent domain - approval by local government - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "INVESTOR-OWNED ELECTRIC UTILITY" OR "UTILITY" MEANS AN
INVESTOR-OWNED UTILITY THAT PROVIDES RETAIL ELECTRIC SERVICE AND
IS REGULATED BY THE COMMISSION.
(b) "LOCAL GOVERNMENT" MEANS A COUNTY, HOME RULE OR
-3- HB26-1278

STATUTORY CITY, TOWN, TERRITORIAL CHARTER CITY, OR CITY AND
COUNTY.
(c) "TRANSMISSION INFRASTRUCTURE" MEANS HIGH-VOLTAGE
TRANSMISSION INFRASTRUCTURE THAT EXCEEDS ONE HUNDRED
KILOVOLTS AND IS OWNED AND OPERATED BY AN INVESTOR-OWNED
ELECTRIC UTILITY.
(2) A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY
ISSUED BY THE COMMISSION PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 5 DOES NOT
CONFER THE POWER OF EMINENT DOMAIN UPON AN INVESTOR-OWNED
ELECTRIC UTILITY UNLESS AND UNTIL:
(a) ALL LOCAL GOVERNMENT LAND USE PERMITS AND APPROVALS
REQUIRED FOR THE TRANSMISSION INFRASTRUCTURE HAVE BEEN ISSUED
BY THE RELEVANT ENTITIES OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT WHERE THE
TRANSMISSION INFRASTRUCTURE WILL BE LOCATED; AND
(b) ANY TAKING OR DAMAGING OF PRIVATE PROPERTY FOR THE
TRANSMISSION INFRASTRUCTURE IS CONDUCTED CONSISTENT WITH
SECTION 15 OF ARTICLE II OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION TO ENSURE JUST
COMPENSATION AND PROHIBIT SPECULATIVE TAKING OF PRIVATE
PROPERTY.
(3) (a) AN INVESTOR-OWNED ELECTRIC UTILITY THAT HAS
RECEIVED A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY FROM
THE COMMISSION FOR TRANSMISSION INFRASTRUCTURE SHALL NOT
INITIATE CONDEMNATION PROCEEDINGS FOR ANY PROPERTY RELATED TO
THE INFRASTRUCTURE UNLESS AND UNTIL THE INVESTOR-OWNED ELECTRIC
UTILITY OBTAINS:
(I) ALL LOCAL GOVERNMENT LAND USE PERMITS AND APPROVALS
ISSUED BY THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT WHERE THE TRANSMISSION
-4- HB26-1278

INFRASTRUCTURE WILL BE LOCATED; AND
(II) CONFIRMATION OF THE FINAL APPROVED PROJECT DESIGN
FROM THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT SUCH THAT THE SPECIFIC PROPERTY
REQUIRED FOR THE TRANSMISSION INFRASTRUCTURE IS IDENTIFIED AND
ANY TAKING OR DAMAGING OF PRIVATE PROPERTY REQUIRED FOR THE
TRANSMISSION INFRASTRUCTURE IS CONDUCTED CONSISTENT WITH
SECTION 15 OF ARTICLE II OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION.
(b) IF THE TRANSMISSION INFRASTRUCTURE WILL BE LOCATED
WITHIN THE JURISDICTION OF MULTIPLE LOCAL GOVERNMENTS, THE
INVESTOR-OWNED ELECTRIC UTILITY SHALL MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF
SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION AND THIS SUBSECTION (3) FOR EACH
SPECIFIC LOCAL GOVERNMENT JURISDICTION WHERE THE TRANSMISSION
INFRASTRUCTURE WILL BE LOCATED BEFORE INITIATING A CONDEMNATION
PROCEEDING RELATED TO THE TRANSMISSION INFRASTRUCTURE WITHIN A
SPECIFIC LOCAL GOVERNMENT JURISDICTION THAT HAS NOT YET APPROVED
THE TRANSMISSION INFRASTRUCTURE.
(4) THE ISSUANCE OF A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND
NECESSITY BY THE COMMISSION PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 5 DOES NOT
RELIEVE AN INVESTOR-OWNED ELECTRIC UTILITY FROM THE UTILITY'S
OBLIGATION TO OBTAIN ALL NECESSARY LOCAL GOVERNMENT LAND USE
PERMITS AND APPROVALS PRIOR TO EXERCISING THE UTILITY'S EMINENT
DOMAIN AUTHORITY.
(5) THIS SECTION SHALL NOT IMPACT OR DELAY EXISTING
APPLICATION REVIEW PROCESSES OR TIMELINES ESTABLISHED BY THE
COMMISSION OR A RELEVANT LOCAL GOVERNMENT.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 29-20-108, add (8)
as follows:
-5- HB26-1278

29-20-108. Local government regulation - location,
construction, or improvement of major electrical or natural gas
facilities - powerline trail notification - expedited review for certain
transmission line projects - transmission infrastructure exception -
legislative declaration - definitions.
(8) (a) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO LOCAL GOVERNMENT
LAND USE PERMITS AND APPROVALS REQUIRED FOR INVESTOR-OWNED
ELECTRIC UTILITIES' TRANSMISSION INFRASTRUCTURE, AS GOVERNED BY
SECTION 40-5-101.3.
(b) AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (8):
(I) "INVESTOR-OWNED ELECTRIC UTILITY" HAS THE MEANING SET
FORTH IN SECTION 40-5-101.3 (1)(a).
(II) "TRANSMISSION INFRASTRUCTURE" HAS THE MEANING SET
FORTH IN SECTION 40-5-101.3 (1)(c).
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect January 1, 2027; except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general
assembly, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
approved by the people at the general election to be held in November
2026 and, in such case, will take effect January 1, 2027, or on the date of
the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor, whichever is
later.
(2) This act applies to condemnation proceedings initiated on or
after the applicable effective date of this act.
-6- HB26-1278